Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1362
Cross or dig up highway; violations; penalty.

Any person, who shall dig up, cross, or otherwise use any portion of the state highway system or drainage facilities of the state highway system for laying or relaying pipelines, ditches, flumes, sewers, railways, for constructing, or installing any new pole line, underground conduit, buried cable, or new guy wires, or for any other similar purpose without obtaining a written permit from the department or without complying with the regulations of the department shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Each and every day that such a violation continues, after the department issues written notification to the violator, may constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 62, p. 443;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 213.